Montana, session 2025, HB696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Legislative approval of siting of uranium conversion and enrichment facilities --
conditions. (1) The legislature hereby authorizes the siting of uranium conversion and enrichment facilities
within Montana. A facility is authorized if:
(a) it is operated on the site of and to convert and enrich mined and milled uranium within the state
or transported from a location mined and milled not within the boundaries of the state;
(b) the facility has received a state recommendation from the department of environmental quality,
pursuant to 75-20-204; and
(c) the facility has received a license to convert and enrich mined and milled uranium from the
federal nuclear regulatory commission.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "uranium conversion" means the process used to convert natural uranium oxide into uranium
hexafluoride; and
(b) "uranium enrichment" means the process used to enrich uranium through gaseous diffusion,
gas centrifuges, or laser isotope separation.
Section 2. Section 75-20-204, MCA, is amended to read:
"75-20-204. Facilities subject to federal energy regulatory commission and nuclear regulatory
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 696
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 696
commission jurisdiction. (1) For a facility that is subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy regulatory
commission, or the nuclear regulatory commission as authorized in [section 1], the department shall file a state
recommendation with the commission.
(2) A person making application to the federal energy regulatory commission or nuclear regulatory
commission as authorized in [section 1] shall file with the department notice of and a copy of the federal
application regarding any facility subject to subsection (1). The state recommendation must be based on its
study of the federal application and other material gained through intervention in the federal proceeding.
(3) A person subject to the provisions of subsection (2) shall pay a fee to the department at the
time that an application is filed with the federal energy regulatory commission or nuclear regulatory commission
as authorized in [section 1]. The fee must be used by the department to carry out its responsibilities to develop
a state recommendation and participate as a party in any necessary federal proceeding to assert the state
recommendation. The fee may not exceed one-half the amount that could be assessed under 75-20-215. A fee
prescribed by 75-20-215 may not be assessed against a person paying a fee under this section.
(4) A person who fails to file a timely notice of and a copy of the federal application with the
department, preventing the department from timely compliance with this section and with the rules, statutes, or
procedures governing the proceedings before the federal energy regulatory commission or nuclear regulatory
commission as authorized in [section 1], is subject to the provisions of 75-20-408."
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
75, chapter 20, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 20, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 696
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 696, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 696
INTRODUCED BY G. PARRY, E. TILLEMAN, G. HERTZ, C. NEUMANN
AN ACT ESTABLISHING LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL OF THE SITING OF URANIUM CONVERSION AND
ENRICHMENT FACILITIES FOR URANIUM MINED AND MILLED WITHIN THE STATE OR TRANSPORTED
FROM A LOCATION MINED AND MILLED NOT WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE STATE; AMENDING
SECTION 75-20-204, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”